Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.116.005

Findings.

The legislature finds that children who grow up in the foster care system face many financial challenges. The legislature also finds that these financial challenges can discourage or prevent these children from pursuing a higher education. The legislature further finds that access to a higher education will give children who are in foster care hope for the future. Moreover, the legislature finds that financial assistance will help these children become successful, productive, contributing citizens and avoid cycles of abuse, poverty, violence, and delinquency.

[ 2005 c 215 s 1.]